SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.aff
# soblex V2.02.06 Bernhard Baier, 20.12.2014
SET UTF-8
FLAG num
TRY	aejonwirtumksplhcdzyšćłběčřžóźgfńBKSM-HPWDANLCJTRvGZČxFŁŠEIŽOöqüUVĆéäçáYÄXňßγ~à_Q32

MAP 7
MAP nń
MAP sš
MAP cćč
MAP rř
MAP zžź
MAP oó
MAP eé


REP 188
REP b bł
REP b p
REP be bo
REP bo be
REP bu by
REP by bu
REP by bó
REP bó by
REP bł b
REP bža łža
REP bžeć łžeć
REP c ts
REP c tč
REP c tř
REP ch chł
REP ch k
REP chł ch
REP d hd
REP d t
REP dš tš
REP dš ć
REP dš č
REP dź ć
REP dź č
REP e ej
REP e je
REP e y
REP e ě
REP ej e
REP ej je
REP ej ě
REP ejć ejč
REP ejć jedź
REP ejć jeć
REP ejć ječ
REP ejč ejć
REP ejč jedź
REP ejč jeć
REP ejč ječ
REP h hł
REP h j
REP hd d
REP hl l
REP hn n
REP hr r
REP hw hł
REP hw w
REP hw wł
REP hw ł
REP hł h
REP hł hw
REP hł w
REP hł wł
REP hł ł
REP j h
REP ja wja
REP je e
REP je ej
REP je ě
REP jedź ejć
REP jedź ejč
REP jedź jeć
REP jedź ječ
REP jeć ejć
REP jeć ejč
REP jeć jedź
REP jeć ječ
REP ječ ejć
REP ječ ejč
REP ječ jedź
REP ječ jeć
REP k ch
REP k kł
REP kł k
REP kř kš
REP kš kř
REP l hl
REP m mł
REP me mo
REP mo me
REP mu my
REP my mu
REP my mó
REP mó my
REP mł m
REP n hn
REP n ń
REP o ó
REP owa wa
REP p b
REP p pł
REP pe po
REP po pe
REP pu py
REP py pu
REP py pó
REP pó py
REP pł p
REP př pš
REP př š
REP pš př
REP pš š
REP r hr
REP r wr
REP rš rž
REP rž rš
REP s ws
REP s z
REP sć šć
REP t d
REP ts c
REP ts tč
REP ts tř
REP tč c
REP tč ts
REP tč tř
REP tř c
REP tř ts
REP tř tč
REP tř tš
REP tř ć
REP tř č
REP tš dš
REP tš tř
REP tš ć
REP tš č
REP uje wje
REP w hw
REP w hł
REP w wł
REP w ł
REP wa owa
REP we wo
REP wja ja
REP wje uje
REP wo we
REP wr r
REP ws s
REP wu wy
REP wy wu
REP wy wó
REP wz z
REP wó wy
REP wł hw
REP wł hł
REP wł w
REP wł ł
REP wš š
REP y e
REP y ě
REP z s
REP z wz
REP ó o
REP ć dš
REP ć dź
REP ć tř
REP ć tš
REP ć č
REP č dš
REP č dź
REP č tř
REP č tš
REP č ć
REP ě e
REP ě ej
REP ě je
REP ě y
REP ł hw
REP ł hł
REP ł w
REP ł wł
REP łe ło
REP ło łe
REP łu ły
REP ły łu
REP ły łó
REP łó ły
REP łž ž
REP łža bža
REP łžeć bžeć
REP ń n
REP š př
REP š pš
REP š wš
REP š ž
REP šć sć
REP ž łž
REP ž š

SFX 0001 Y 8
SFX 0001 a ach .
SFX 0001 a am .
SFX 0001 a ami .
SFX 0001 a je .
SFX 0001 a omaj .
SFX 0001 a ow .
SFX 0001 a u .
SFX 0001 a y .

SFX 0002 Y 7
SFX 0002 a ach .
SFX 0002 a am .
SFX 0002 a ami .
SFX 0002 a omaj .
SFX 0002 a ow .
SFX 0002 a u .
SFX 0002 a y .

SFX 0003 Y 11
SFX 0003 0 ja .
SFX 0003 0 jach .
SFX 0003 0 jam .
SFX 0003 0 jej .
SFX 0003 0 jemi .
SFX 0003 0 jo .
SFX 0003 0 jojo .
SFX 0003 0 jom .
SFX 0003 0 jomaj .
SFX 0003 0 jow .
SFX 0003 0 ju .

SFX 0004 Y 4
SFX 0004 e ach .
SFX 0004 e am .
SFX 0004 e emi .
SFX 0004 e ow .

SFX 0005 Y 12
SFX 0005 0 a .
SFX 0005 0 ach .
SFX 0005 0 aj .
SFX 0005 0 am .
SFX 0005 0 ami .
SFX 0005 0 ej .
SFX 0005 0 je .
SFX 0005 0 o .
SFX 0005 0 om .
SFX 0005 0 omaj .
SFX 0005 0 ow .
SFX 0005 0 y .

SFX 0006 Y 19
SFX 0006 a aj .
SFX 0006 a e .
SFX 0006 a eho .
SFX 0006 a ej .
SFX 0006 a eje .
SFX 0006 a eju .
SFX 0006 a emu .
SFX 0006 a i .
SFX 0006 a iši .
SFX 0006 a išo .
SFX 0006 a je .
SFX 0006 a oh .
SFX 0006 a om .
SFX 0006 a u .
SFX 0006 a y .
SFX 0006 a ych .
SFX 0006 a ym .
SFX 0006 a ymaj .
SFX 0006 a ymi .

SFX 0007 Y 11
SFX 0007 0 a .
SFX 0007 0 ach .
SFX 0007 0 am .
SFX 0007 0 e .
SFX 0007 0 ej .
SFX 0007 0 emi .
SFX 0007 0 o .
SFX 0007 0 om .
SFX 0007 0 omaj .
SFX 0007 0 ow .
SFX 0007 0 u .

SFX 0008 Y 12
SFX 0008 k cy .
SFX 0008 k ka .
SFX 0008 k kach .
SFX 0008 k kaj .
SFX 0008 k kam .
SFX 0008 k kami .
SFX 0008 k kej .
SFX 0008 k ko .
SFX 0008 k kom .
SFX 0008 k komaj .
SFX 0008 k kow .
SFX 0008 k ku .

SFX 0009 Y 19
SFX 0009 a aj .
SFX 0009 a e .
SFX 0009 a eho .
SFX 0009 a ej .
SFX 0009 a eje .
SFX 0009 a eju .
SFX 0009 a emu .
SFX 0009 a i .
SFX 0009 a je .
SFX 0009 a oh .
SFX 0009 a om .
SFX 0009 a u .
SFX 0009 a y .
SFX 0009 a ych .
SFX 0009 a ym .
SFX 0009 a ymaj .
SFX 0009 a ymi .
SFX 0009 a ši .
SFX 0009 a šo .

SFX 0010 Y 8
SFX 0010 a ach .
SFX 0010 a am .
SFX 0010 a e .
SFX 0010 a emi .
SFX 0010 a i .
SFX 0010 a omaj .
SFX 0010 a ow .
SFX 0010 a u .

SFX 0011 Y 13
SFX 0011 t ta .
SFX 0011 t tach .
SFX 0011 t taj .
SFX 0011 t tam .
SFX 0011 t tami .
SFX 0011 t tej .
SFX 0011 t to .
SFX 0011 t tom .
SFX 0011 t tomaj .
SFX 0011 t tow .
SFX 0011 t tu .
SFX 0011 t ća .
SFX 0011 t će .

SFX 0012 Y 8
SFX 0012 ce ka ..
SFX 0012 ce kach ..
SFX 0012 ce kam ..
SFX 0012 ce kami ..
SFX 0012 ce ki ..
SFX 0012 ce komaj ..
SFX 0012 ce kow ..
SFX 0012 ce ku ..

SFX 0013 Y 14
SFX 0013 cy ka ..
SFX 0013 cy kaj ..
SFX 0013 cy ke ..
SFX 0013 cy keho ..
SFX 0013 cy kej ..
SFX 0013 cy keje ..
SFX 0013 cy keju ..
SFX 0013 cy kemu ..
SFX 0013 cy ki ..
SFX 0013 cy kich ..
SFX 0013 cy kim ..
SFX 0013 cy kimaj ..
SFX 0013 cy kimi ..
SFX 0013 cy ku ..

SFX 0014 Y 16
SFX 0014 a aj .
SFX 0014 a e .
SFX 0014 a eho .
SFX 0014 a ej .
SFX 0014 a eje .
SFX 0014 a eju .
SFX 0014 a emu .
SFX 0014 a i .
SFX 0014 a oh .
SFX 0014 a om .
SFX 0014 a u .
SFX 0014 a y .
SFX 0014 a ych .
SFX 0014 a ym .
SFX 0014 a ymaj .
SFX 0014 a ymi .

SFX 0015 Y 29
SFX 0015 uj owach ..
SFX 0015 uj owachmoj ..
SFX 0015 uj owachmy ..
SFX 0015 uj owachu ..
SFX 0015 uj owacy ..
SFX 0015 uj owali ..
SFX 0015 uj owanje ..
SFX 0015 uj owany ..
SFX 0015 uj ować ..
SFX 0015 uj ował ..
SFX 0015 uj owała ..
SFX 0015 uj owało ..
SFX 0015 uj owałoj ..
SFX 0015 uj owaše ..
SFX 0015 uj owaštaj ..
SFX 0015 uj owaštej ..
SFX 0015 uj owašće ..
SFX 0015 uj uja ..
SFX 0015 uj uje ..
SFX 0015 uj ujemoj ..
SFX 0015 uj ujemy ..
SFX 0015 uj ujetaj ..
SFX 0015 uj ujetej ..
SFX 0015 uj ujeće ..
SFX 0015 uj uješ ..
SFX 0015 uj ujtaj ..
SFX 0015 uj ujtej ..
SFX 0015 uj uju ..
SFX 0015 uj ujće ..

SFX 0016 Y 12
SFX 0016 t ta .
SFX 0016 t tach .
SFX 0016 t taj .
SFX 0016 t tam .
SFX 0016 t tami .
SFX 0016 t tej .
SFX 0016 t to .
SFX 0016 t tom .
SFX 0016 t tomaj .
SFX 0016 t tow .
SFX 0016 t ty .
SFX 0016 t će .

SFX 0017 Y 9
SFX 0017 a ach .
SFX 0017 a am .
SFX 0017 a ami .
SFX 0017 a je .
SFX 0017 a o .
SFX 0017 a om .
SFX 0017 a omaj .
SFX 0017 a ow .
SFX 0017 a u .

SFX 0018 Y 11
SFX 0018 a ach .
SFX 0018 a aj .
SFX 0018 a am .
SFX 0018 a ami .
SFX 0018 a ej .
SFX 0018 a je .
SFX 0018 a o .
SFX 0018 a om .
SFX 0018 a omaj .
SFX 0018 a ow .
SFX 0018 a y .

SFX 0019 Y 11
SFX 0019 t ta .
SFX 0019 t tach .
SFX 0019 t taj .
SFX 0019 t tam .
SFX 0019 t tami .
SFX 0019 t tej .
SFX 0019 t to .
SFX 0019 t tom .
SFX 0019 t tomaj .
SFX 0019 t tow .
SFX 0019 t će .

SFX 0020 Y 9
SFX 0020 i ja .
SFX 0020 i jach .
SFX 0020 i jam .
SFX 0020 i je .
SFX 0020 i jemi .
SFX 0020 i jom .
SFX 0020 i jomaj .
SFX 0020 i jow .
SFX 0020 i ju .

SFX 0021 Y 13
SFX 0021 0 a .
SFX 0021 0 ach .
SFX 0021 0 aj .
SFX 0021 0 am .
SFX 0021 0 ami .
SFX 0021 0 ej .
SFX 0021 0 je .
SFX 0021 0 o .
SFX 0021 0 ojo .
SFX 0021 0 om .
SFX 0021 0 omaj .
SFX 0021 0 ow .
SFX 0021 0 u .

SFX 0022 Y 5
SFX 0022 0 ach .
SFX 0022 0 am .
SFX 0022 0 ami .
SFX 0022 0 ow .
SFX 0022 0 y .

SFX 0023 Y 8
SFX 0023 0 ach .
SFX 0023 0 am .
SFX 0023 0 e .
SFX 0023 0 emi .
SFX 0023 0 i .
SFX 0023 0 omaj .
SFX 0023 0 ow .
SFX 0023 0 u .

SFX 0024 Y 13
SFX 0024 an ana ..
SFX 0024 an anach ..
SFX 0024 an anaj ..
SFX 0024 an anam ..
SFX 0024 an anami ..
SFX 0024 an anej ..
SFX 0024 an anje ..
SFX 0024 an ano ..
SFX 0024 an anom ..
SFX 0024 an anomaj ..
SFX 0024 an anow ..
SFX 0024 an anu ..
SFX 0024 an enjo ..

SFX 0025 Y 17
SFX 0025 ši sce ..
SFX 0025 ši scy ..
SFX 0025 ši ska ..
SFX 0025 ši skaj ..
SFX 0025 ši ske ..
SFX 0025 ši skeho ..
SFX 0025 ši skej ..
SFX 0025 ši skeje ..
SFX 0025 ši skeju ..
SFX 0025 ši skemu ..
SFX 0025 ši ski ..
SFX 0025 ši skich ..
SFX 0025 ši skim ..
SFX 0025 ši skimaj ..
SFX 0025 ši skimi ..
SFX 0025 ši sku ..
SFX 0025 ši šo ..

SFX 0026 Y 4
SFX 0026 y ach .
SFX 0026 y am .
SFX 0026 y ami .
SFX 0026 y ow .

SFX 0027 Y 12
SFX 0027 0 a .
SFX 0027 0 ach .
SFX 0027 0 aj .
SFX 0027 0 am .
SFX 0027 0 ami .
SFX 0027 0 ej .
SFX 0027 0 o .
SFX 0027 0 om .
SFX 0027 0 omaj .
SFX 0027 0 ow .
SFX 0027 0 u .
SFX 0027 0 y .
