SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.dic
Bahamy/0026
Beirućan/0024
Bóšerčan/0024
Cymplčanscy/0013
Dobrančan/0024
Droby/0026
Düsseldorfčance/0012
Fereje/0004
Guyanjan/0024
Jaltascy/0013
Jendźelčan/0024
Kinajcht/0019
Kujbyšewčan/0024
Kukečance/0012
Małowjelkowscy/0013
Michałčan/0024
Miłoražan/0021
Němskopazličan/0024
Pyreneje/0004
Póckowčance/0012
Přezdrěnčanscy/0013
Sedmihory/0026
Stockholmjan/0024
Trjebuz/0027
Worcyn/0005
Złyčinjance/0012
aba/0018
abonent/0019
abrahamowin/0022
alowej/0007
anale/0004
anarchist/0011
antropologija/0010
appartement/0019
archiwar/0021
aritmetiši/0025
ascendenca/0002
atentat/0016
awentura/0001
barowa/0014
biskopscy/0013
bjezdušna/0006
blidotenist/0011
bojosćiwa/0009
bon/0005
bramar/0003
bypass/0027
běrokratiši/0025
capricci/0007
cement/0019
chemotaksa/0002
chrymst/0016
chłostarnjowa/0014
ciwilizacija/0010
cypy/0026
dalokowikowar/0003
defektna/0006
defensiwa/0001
definicijowa/0009
delinkwent/0011
depozitar/0021
dlijak/0008
doktorstwa/0017
dokładnosć/0023
doporučence/0012
durje/0004
dynama/0018
dynamizm/0005
dyrdomdej/0007
dźesaćdnjowa/0009
dźibutiši/0025
dźěłapołna/0006
eksitus/0027
eksponat/0016
eleganca/0002
elegija/0010
elektroskowani/0020
esperantist/0011
ferije/0004
firmament/0019
folklorist/0011
fundamentalistiši/0025
galan/0021
galera/0001
garantija/0010
gremiumowa/0014
hańbna/0006
hejer/0003
heksagram/0005
hemoridy/0026
herbarij/0007
hodownikowa/0018
holocaust/0016
hordak/0008
hryst/0019
hudźbnin/0022
humjeńca/0002
husle/0004
hymnus/0027
hypotaktiši/0025
hóčce/0012
imensnosć/0023
impresionist/0011
improwizuj/0015
infuzija/0010
instalaciscy/0013
jadriwa/0009
jakobin/0021
jednaćelstwa/0017
jehlinače/0004
jěrizna/0001
karamel/0007
kartawsa/0002
kina/0018
klep/0005
klěšće/0004
knyskot/0019
kolektiwistiši/0025
kompas/0027
komplot/0016
koncentracija/0010
kondensatowa/0014
kongenialna/0006
konsument/0011
konterrewolucionar/0021
kołćer/0003
kožokřidłač/0007
kurjak/0008
kurjawa/0001
kólpica/0002
kótły/0026
kłóskarce/0012
lidorstwa/0017
ličbowc/0027
lodorejowar/0003
ludnosć/0023
ludohospodar/0003
lutheran/0021
lóft/0016
marela/0010
masowopolitiši/0025
mebl/0007
mejemjetani/0020
milion/0005
misale/0004
mjenin/0022
mjenoswjećba/0001
mokawa/0009
molekulowa/0014
nabóčnik/0008
napisma/0017
narodnin/0022
natwarna/0006
nazymscy/0013
negližej/0007
neuralgiši/0025
niłkosć/0023
njeaspirěruj/0015
njekarikěruj/0015
njepohódnoćuj/0015
njerozkładuj/0015
njewopłodźuj/0015
njezamóžliwa/0009
njezawjertuj/0015
noblesa/0002
non-stop-lět/0019
nowostce/0012
nurjak/0008
nutrin/0022
něžnosć/0023
oboist/0011
oligarchija/0010
omlet/0016
originalna/0006
ornitolog/0021
panamerikanizm/0005
pastyr/0003
pačosy/0026
piklhawba/0001
pincetowa/0014
pišćele/0004
podlěs/0027
pominani/0020
porta/0018
posmjertnin/0022
potomnistwa/0017
połkownik/0008
praswět/0016
prašliwa/0009
preformacija/0010
priskot/0019
proletar/0021
propagandist/0011
pružnosć/0023
prózdnin/0022
pseudonym/0005
psyca/0002
puć/0007
pěškuj/0015
płódosćěna/0001
přenošna/0006
přeraženi/0020
přewoznik/0008
přewuši/0025
přistupna/0014
rekonstrukciscy/0013
rostlinarstwa/0017
rozprawnik/0008
rozpušćeni/0020
rozłožowar/0003
rulet/0016
rumnosć/0023
róla/0010
saboter/0021
samowobraz/0027
separatist/0011
serniwa/0009
shortsy/0026
skalp/0005
skiba/0001
skušuj/0015
smjetańca/0002
społnomócnjena/0014
srjedźodobna/0006
statoškit/0019
stewardce/0012
stowaršnostnjeni/0020
stoćin/0022
stripowar/0003
stronjan/0024
sužrěbnosć/0023
swisle/0004
swit/0016
swobodnik/0008
swójstwa/0017
tarakawa/0001
termoelektriši/0025
termy/0026
titl/0007
trafa/0018
trocheusowa/0009
trypsin/0005
voltamperowa/0014
wačokinošer/0003
wiceprezident/0011
wobstajna/0006
wobydlerscy/0013
wobšudnica/0002
woclownik/0008
wodatosć/0023
wojerstwa/0017
wojowani/0020
wosomdźesaćin/0022
wotšćěpjeni/0020
wubědźuj/0015
wudźenc/0027
wuměnliwa/0009
wusydleni/0020
wěrywuznaćowa/0014
włoknizny/0026
zamołwitosć/0023
zaroćerstwa/0017
zawjedźeni/0020
ćežkochora/0009
ćěkanča/0010
česćepołna/0006
činićelce/0012
łódźełójenscy/0013
Šwikawa/0001
šarm/0005
šeptak/0008
šipica/0002
šparar/0003
šwikač/0007
šćedrjenc/0027
šědźiwstwa/0017
šěsćdźesaćin/0022
